Tennessee, session 114, SB2406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-272(b)(4), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
(Q) Evaluation of the security measures in place to ensure the safety of patients
and staff;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2406
012167
- 1 -